Utah statutes.
53B-1-103.   Establishment of State Board of Regents -- Powers and
authority.
(1)  There is established a State Board of Regents.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the board is vested with the
control, management, and supervision of the institutions of higher education
designated in Section 53B-1-102 in a manner consistent with the policy and
purpose of this title and the specific powers and responsibilities granted to
it.
(b)  The board may only exercise powers relating to the Utah College of
Applied Technology and its college campuses that are specifically provided in
this title.
(c)  The board shall coordinate and support articulation agreements between
the Utah College of Applied Technology and other institutions of higher
education.
(d)  The board shall prepare and submit an annual report detailing its
progress and recommendations on career and technical education issues to the
governor and to the Legislature's Education Interim Committee by October 31 of
each year, which shall include information detailing:
(i)  how the career and technical education needs of secondary students are
being met by institutions of higher education other than the Utah College of
Applied Technology, including what access secondary students have to programs
offered by Salt Lake Community College's School of Applied Technology, Snow
College, and Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah;
(ii)  how the emphasis on high demand, high wage, and high skill jobs in
business and industry is being provided;
(iii)  performance outcomes, including:
(A)  entered employment;
(B)  job retention; and
(C)  earnings; and
(iv)  student tuition and fees.
(e)  Except for the Utah College of Applied Technology, the board may modify
the name of an institution under its control and management, as designated in
Section 53B-1-102, to reflect the role and general course of study of the
institution.
(f)  The board may not conduct a feasibility study or perform another act
relating to merging any of the following institutions with another institution
of higher education:
(i)  the Bridgerland Applied Technology College Campus;
(ii)  the Ogden-Weber Applied Technology College Campus;
(iii)  the Davis Applied Technology College Campus;
(iv)  the Tooele Applied Technology College Campus;
(v)  the Mountainland Applied Technology College Campus;
(vi)  the Uintah Basin Applied Technology College Campus;
(vii)  the Southwest Applied Technology College Campus; and
(viii)  the Dixie Applied Technology College Campus.
(3)  This section does not affect the power and authority vested in the State
Board of Education to apply for, accept, and manage federal appropriations for
the establishment and maintenance of career and technical education.
